Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-506
Governor and Lieutenant Governor; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

The Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1994 and each four years thereafter. Such officers shall serve for terms of four years or until their successors are elected and qualified. Candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall meet the qualifications found in Article IV, sections 1 and 2, of the Constitution of Nebraska. The Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 102.